ko: 되감기 작동 모드: 빨리 감기 및 카운터 리셋; 되감기; 되감기 및 빨리 감기; 되감기 전용; 기타
sk-SK: Režim prevádzky prevíjačky: Rýchle pretáčanie a reset počítadla; Pretáčanie; Pretáčanie a rýchle pretáčanie; Iba pretáčanie; Iné
fr: Mode de fonctionnement de l’enrouleur: Avance rapide et réinitialisation du compteur; Rembobinage; Rembobinage et avance rapide; Rembobinage seulement; Autre
da: Tilbagespoler-betjeningstilstand: Fremspoling og tællernulstilling; Tilbagespoling; Tilbagespoling og fremspoling; Kun tilbagespoling; Andet
fi: Kelauslaitteen toimintatila: Pikakelaus eteenpäin ja laskurin nollaus; Takaisinkelaus; Takaisinkelaus ja pikakelaus eteenpäin; Vain takaisinkelaus; Muu
zh-TW: 倒帶器操作模式: 快轉計數器重置; 倒帶; 倒帶快轉; 僅倒帶; 其他
hu: Visszatekerő működési mód: Gyors előretekerés és számlálóvisszaállítás; Visszatekerés; Visszatekerés és gyors előretekerés; Csak visszatekerés; Egyéb
ro-RO: Mod de operare derulator: Derulare rapidă și resetare contor; Rebobinare; Rebobinare și derulare rapidă; Doar rebobinare; Altele
hr-HR: Način rada premotavača: Brzo premotavanje i resetiranje brojača; Premotavanje; Premotavanje i brzo premotavanje; Samo premotavanje; Ostalo
tr: Geri sarıcı çalışma modu: Hızlı ileri sarma ve sayaç sıfırlama; Geri sarma; Geri sarma ve hızlı ileri sarma; Sadece geri sarma; Diğer
bg-BG: Режим на работа на машината за пренамотка: Бързо превъртане и нулиране на брояча; Превъртане назад; Превъртане назад и бързо превъртане; Само превъртане назад; Други
sl-SI: Način delovanja previjača: Hitro previjanje naprej in ponastavitev števca; Previjanje nazaj; Previjanje nazaj in hitro naprej; Samo previjanje nazaj; Drugo
vi: Chế độ vận hành máy tua lại: Tua nhanh và đặt lại bộ đếm; Tua lại; Tua lại và tua nhanh; Chỉ tua lại; Khác
cs: Režim provozu převíječe: Rychlý posun a reset počítadla; Převíjení; Převíjení a rychlý posun; Pouze převíjení; Jiné
sv: Återspolningsläge: Snabbspolning framåt och återställning av räknare; Tillbakaspolning; Tillbakaspolning och snabbspolning framåt; Endast tillbakaspolning; Övrigt
en: Rewinder operation mode: Fast forward & counter reset; Rewind; Rewind & fast forward; Rewind only; Other
pt-PT: Modo de operação do rebobinador: Avanço rápido e reinício do contador; Rebobinar; Rebobinar e avanço rápido; Apenas rebobinar; Outro
lt-LT: Persukimo įrenginio veikimo režimas: Greitas persukimas ir skaitiklio atstatymas; Atsukimas; Atsukimas ir greitas persukimas; Tik atsukimas; Kita
th: โหมดการทำงานของเครื่องกรอ: เดินหน้าเร็วและรีเซ็ตตัวนับ; กรอกลับ; กรอกลับและเดินหน้าเร็ว; กรอกลับเท่านั้น; อื่นๆ
pl: Tryb działania przewijarki: Przewijanie do przodu i zerowanie licznika; Przewijanie; Przewijanie i przewijanie do przodu; Tylko przewijanie; Inne
nl: Terugspoeler bedieningsmodus: Vooruitspoelen en teller resetten; Terugspoelen; Terugspoelen en vooruitspoelen; Alleen terugspoelen; Andere
nb: Oppspoler driftsmodus: Fremspilling og tellernullstilling; Tilbakespoling; Tilbakespoling og fremspilling; Kun tilbakespoling; Annet
pt-BR: Modo de operação do rebobinador: Avanço rápido e reinicialização do contador; Rebobinar; Rebobinar e avanço rápido; Apenas rebobinar; Outro
zh-CN: 倒带器操作模式: 快进和计数器重置; 倒带; 倒带和快进; 仅倒带; 其他
el: Τρόπος λειτουργίας επανατυλίκτη: Γρήγορη προώθηση και επαναφορά μετρητή; Επαναφορά; Επαναφορά και γρήγορη προώθηση; Μόνο επαναφορά; Άλλο
de: Rückspuler-Betriebsmodus: Schnellvorlauf und Zählerrückstellung; Zurückspulen; Zurückspulen und Schnellvorlauf; Nur zurückspulen; Sonstiges
ja: リワインダー動作モード: 早送り・カウンターリセット; 巻き戻し; 巻き戻し・早送り; 巻き戻しのみ; その他
it: Modalità di funzionamento del riavvolgitore: Avanzamento veloce e azzeramento contatore; Riavvolgimento; Riavvolgimento e avanzamento veloce; Solo riavvolgimento; Altro
es: Modo de operación del rebobinador: Avance rápido y reinicio del contador; Rebobinado; Rebobinado y avance rápido; Solo rebobinado; Otros
ru: Режим работы перемотчика: Быстрая перемотка вперёд и сброс счётчика; Перемотка; Перемотка назад и вперёд; Только перемотка; Другой